Utah statutes.
17-21-20.   Recording required -- Recorder may impose requirements on
documents to be recorded -- Prerequisites -- Additional fee for noncomplying
documents -- Recorder may require tax serial number -- Exceptions --
Requirements for recording final local entity plat.
(1)  Subject to Subsections (2), (3), and (4), each paper, notice, and
instrument required by law to be recorded in the office of the county recorder
shall be recorded unless otherwise provided.
(2)  Each document executed on or after July 1, 2007 that is submitted for
recording to a county recorder's office shall:
(a)  unless otherwise provided by law, be an original or certified copy of the
document;
(b)  be in English or be accompanied by an accurate English translation of the
document;
(c)  contain a brief title, heading, or caption on the first page stating the
nature of the document;
(d)  contain the legal description of the property that is the subject of the
document;
(e)  comply with the requirements of Section 17-21-25 and Subsections
57-3-105(1) and (2);
(f)  be notarized with the notary stamp with the seal legible; and
(g)  have original signatures.
(3) (a)  Beginning September 1, 2007, a county recorder may require that each
paper, notice, and instrument submitted for recording in the county recorder's
office:
(i)  be on white paper that is 8-1/2 inches by 11 inches in size;
(ii)  have a margin of one inch on the left and right sides and at the bottom
of each page;
(iii)  have a space of 2-1/2 inches down and 4-1/2 inches across the upper
right corner of the first page and a margin of one inch at the top of each
succeeding page;
(iv)  not be on sheets of paper that are continuously bound together at the
side, top, or bottom;
(v)  not contain printed material on more than one side of each page;
(vi)  be printed in black ink and not have text smaller than seven lines of
text per vertical inch; and
(vii)  be sufficiently legible to make certified copies.
(b)  A county recorder who intends to establish requirements under Subsection
(3)(a) shall first:
(i)  provide formal notice of the requirements; and
(ii)  establish and publish an effective date for the requirements that is at
least three months after the formal notice under Subsection (3)(b)(i).
(c)  If a county recorder establishes requirements under this Subsection (3),
the county recorder may charge and collect from persons who submit a document
for recording that does not comply with the requirements, in addition to any
other fee that the county recorder is authorized to charge and collect, a fee
that:
(i)  is calculated to recover the additional cost of handling and recording
noncomplying documents; and
(ii)  may not exceed $2 per page.
(4) (a)  To facilitate the abstracting of an instrument, a county recorder may
require that the applicable tax serial number of each parcel described in the
instrument be noted on the instrument before it may be accepted for recording.
(b)  If a county recorder requires the applicable tax serial number to be on
an instrument before it may be recorded:
(i)  the county recorder shall post a notice of that requirement in a
conspicuous place at the recorder's office;
(ii)  the tax serial number may not be considered to be part of the legal
description and may be indicated on the margin of the instrument; and
(iii)  an error in the tax serial number does not affect the validity of the
instrument or effectiveness of the recording.
(5)  Subsections (2), (3), and (4) do not apply to:
(a)  a map;
(b)  a certificate or affidavit of death;
(c)  a military discharge;
(d)  a document regarding taxes that is issued by the Internal Revenue Service
of the United States Department of the Treasury;
(e)  a document submitted for recording that has been filed with a court and
conforms to the formatting requirements established by the court; or
(f)  a document submitted for recording that is in a form required by law.
(6) (a)  As used in this Subsection (6):
(i)  "Boundary action" has the same meaning as defined in Section 17-23-20.
(ii)  "Local entity" has the same meaning as defined in Section 67-1a-6.5.
(b)  A person may not submit to a county recorder for recording a plat
depicting the boundary of a local entity as the boundary exists as a result of
a boundary action, unless:
(i)  the plat has been approved under Section 17-23-20 by the county surveyor
as a final local entity plat, as defined in Section 17-23-20; and
(ii)  the person also submits for recording:
(A)  the original notice of an impending boundary action, as defined in
Section 67-1a-6.5, for the boundary action for which the plat is submitted for
recording; and
(B)  the original applicable certificate, as defined in Section 67-1a-6.5,
issued by the lieutenant governor under Section 67-1a-6.5 for the boundary
action for which the plat is submitted for recording; and
(C)  each other document required by statute to be submitted for recording
with the notice of an impending boundary action and applicable certificate.
(c)  Promptly after recording the documents described in Subsection (6)(b)
relating to a boundary action, but no later than 10 days after recording, the
county recorder shall send a copy of all those documents to the State Tax
Commission.
